Washington statutes.
RCW 26.28.040

Disaffirmance barred in certain cases.

No contract can be thus disaffirmed in cases where on account of the minor's own misrepresentations as to his or her majority, or from his or her having engaged in business as an adult, the other party had good reasons to believe the minor capable of contracting.

[ 2011 c 336 s 695; 1866 p 93 s 3; RRS s 5830.]